fi: Magnesian muoto: Pallo; Pala; Neste; Tahna; Jauhe; Suihke; Muu
tr: Kavrama tebeşiri formu: Top; Blok; Sıvı; Macun; Toz; Sprey; Diğer
hr-HR: Grip kreda za oblikovanje: Kuglica; Blok; Tekućina; Pasta; Prah; Sprej; Ostalo
it: Forma di gesso per impugnare: Palla; Panetto; Liquido; Pasta; Polvere; Spray; Altro
pt-PT: Forma de giz para aderência: Bola; Bloco; Líquido; Pasta; Pó; Spray; Outro
cs: Forma hořčíkového prášku: Koule; Kostka; Tekutá; Pasta; Prášek; Sprej; Ostatní
ko: 그립 초크 형태: 볼; 블록; 액체; 페이스트; 분말; 스프레이; 기타
nl: Gripkrijt vorm: Bal; Blok; Vloeibaar; Pasta; Poeder; Spray; Overig
pt-BR: Giz de aderência forma: Bola; Bloco; Líquido; Pasta; Pó; Spray; Outro
de: Form der Griffkreide: Ball; Block; Flüssig; Paste; Pulver; Spray; Sonstige
hu: Magnézium formája: Golyó; Tömb; Folyadék; Paszta; Por; Spray; Egyéb
sv: Gripkritform: Boll; Block; Flytande; Pasta; Pulver; Spray; Övrigt
vi: Hình dạng phấn bám: Bóng; Khối; Chất lỏng; Dạng sệt; Dạng bột; Dạng xịt; Khác
pl: Forma kredy do chwytu: Kula; Kostka; Płyn; Pasta; Proszek; Spray; Inne
es: Forma de tiza de agarre: Bola; Bloque; Líquido; Pasta; Polvo; Aerosol; Otro
el: Μορφή κιμωλίας λαβής: Μπάλα; Κύβος; Υγρό; Πάστα; Σκόνη; Σπρέι; Άλλο
bg-BG: Форма на магнезия за захват: Топка; Блокче; Течна; Паста; Прахообразна; Спрей; Друго
zh-CN: 握把粉形态: 球状; 块状; 液体; 膏状; 粉末; 喷雾; 其他
nb: Grep krittform: Ball; Blokk; Flytende; Pasta; Pulver; Spray; Annet
ru: Форма мела для хвата: Шарик; Брикет; Жидкая; Паста; Порошок; Спрей; Другое
lt-LT: Sukibimo kreidos forma: Rutuliukas; Blokas; Skystis; Pasta; Milteliai; Purškiklis; Kita
ro-RO: Forma produsului de cretă pentru aderență: Minge; Bloc; Lichid; Pastă; Pulbere; Spray; Altele
zh-TW: 防滑粉形式: 球狀; 塊狀; 液態; 膏狀; 粉末; 噴霧; 其他
sl-SI: Oblika krede za oprijem: Kroglica; Blok; Tekočina; Pasta; Prah; Pršilo; Drugo
th: รูปทรงชอล์กจับ: ลูกบอล; ก้อน; แบบน้ำ; เนื้อครีม; ผง; สเปรย์; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Forma športovej kriedy: Guľôčka; Kocka; Tekutá; Pasta; Prášok; Sprej; Iné
da: Form af gribekridt: Kugle; Blok; Væske; Pasta; Pulver; Spray; Andet
en: Grip chalk form: Ball; Block; Liquid; Paste; Powder; Spray; Other
fr: Forme de la magnésie: Balle; Bloc; Liquide; Pâte; Poudre; Vaporisateur; Autre
ja: グリップチョークフォーム: ボール; ブロック; リキッド; ペースト; パウダー; スプレー; その他